Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-5,101
Pupil; attend school in adjoining state; reciprocity required.

No application for attendance of a pupil in a school of another state pursuant to sections 79-599 to 79-5,103 shall be approved unless such state has in force an act which the State Board of Education determines to be similar to such sections.

Laws 1971, LB 469, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,106.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 354.